Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-2206
Retail motor fuel site; requirements.

A retail motor fuel site that is improved using grants under the program shall comply with federal and state standards governing new or upgraded motor fuel storage tanks used to store and dispense renewable fuels. A retail motor fuel site that is improved using grants under the program shall not use such infrastructure to store and dispense motor fuel other than the type of renewable fuel approved by the department in the cost-share agreement, unless granted a waiver by the department.

Laws 2019, LB585, § 6.